Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1003 Closing estates; by
sworn statement of personal representative. (a) Unless prohibited by
order of the court and except for estates being administered in supervised
administration proceedings, a personal representative may close an estate by
filing with the court no earlier than six months after the date of original
appointment of a general personal representative for the estate, a verified
statement stating that the personal representatives or a previous personal
representative, has:

(1) Determined that the time limited for presentation
of creditors' claims has expired;

(2) Fully administered the estate of the decedent by
making payment, settlement, or other disposition of all claims that were
presented, expenses of administration and estate, inheritance and other death
taxes, except as specified in the statement, and that the assets of the estate
have been distributed to the persons entitled. If any claims remain
undischarged, the statement must state whether the personal representative has
distributed the estate subject to possible liability with the agreement of the
distributees or state in detail other arrangements that have been made to
accommodate outstanding liabilities; and

(3) Sent a copy of the statement to all distributees
of the estate and to all creditors or other claimants of whom the personal
representative is aware whose claims are neither paid nor barred and has
furnished a full account in writing of the personal representative's
administration to the distributees whose interests are affected thereby.

(b) If no proceedings involving the personal
representative are pending in the court one year after the closing statement is
filed, the appointment of the personal representative terminates. [L 1996, c
288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next